North Carolina, session 2025, HB351.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this act:
(1) Certified Recovery-Friendly Workplace. – A workplace that meets the criteria
for certification as established by this act, attains designation as certified by
the Recovery-Friendly Workplace Program, and receives written
documentation from the Program of such designation.
(2) Employee. – Any person who works for salary, wages, or other remuneration
for an employer subject to the provisions of this act and includes individuals
in managerial positions, those working for or on behalf of the State,
contractors, and individuals in work-from-home positions.
(3) Employer. – Any public or private person or entity that has one or more
employees who are residents of the State and who are covered by the State's
workers' compensation act or that conducts business in or within the State.
The term includes the State and any department, agency, or instrumentality of
the State; any county; any municipal corporation; and any employer that is
self-insured.
(4) Participant. – A workplace that meets the criteria for participant status as
established by this act, attains designation as a participant by the
Recovery-Friendly Workplace Program, and receives documentation from the
Program of such designation.
(5) Recovery. – A process of change through which individuals improve their
health and wellness, live a self-directed life, and strive to reach their full
potential.
(6) Recovery-Friendly Workplace Advisor. – An individual who is an employee
of or contractor for the Recovery-Friendly Workplace Program and whose
duties include assisting employers through the process of becoming a
Recovery-Friendly Workplace participant or a certified Recovery-Friendly
Workplace.
SECTION 1.(b) Program Established. – There is established the Recovery-Friendly
Workplace Program (Program). The North Carolina Department of Health and Human Services
shall task an appropriate professional organization with demonstrated expertise in promoting
recovery-supportive practices, engaging with employers, and implementing evidence-based
*H351-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
strategies to support individuals in recovery. The organization must have a proven track record
of working collaboratively with businesses and recovery communities across the State to foster
inclusive and supportive workplace environments.
The Program shall also prioritize collaboration with an accredited Recovery
Community Organization (RCO) that has direct experience in implementing Recovery-Friendly
Workplace initiatives in North Carolina to ensure the successful integration of peer-driven
approaches and lived experience in the Program's design and execution.
At a minimum, the Program shall do all of the following:
(1) Develop a process for employers to apply to become Recovery-Friendly
Workplace participants or certified as a Recovery-Friendly Workplace;
(2) Develop an orientation process with training materials for new employers,
including information on the science of addiction, stigma reduction, and
evidence-based practices for supporting employees in recovery;
(3) Provide consultation, guidance, and support to employers seeking to become
participants or certified Recovery-Friendly Workplaces;
(4) Conduct outreach to key stakeholders within the State, including labor unions
and recovery support organizations;
(5) Hire or contract with Recovery-Friendly Workplace Advisors;
(6) Assign a Recovery-Friendly Workplace Advisor to each participating
employer;
(7) Provide certificates to participating employers;
(8) Develop a Program website with resources and information;
(9) Develop educational and training resources for employers and employees,
including materials on naloxone administration and overdose prevention; and
(10) Develop model Recovery-Friendly Workplace policies and procedures for use
by employers, including guidance on nondiscriminatory hiring practices and
reasonable accommodations.
SECTION 1.(c) Requirements. – An employer may choose to participate as a
participant or as a certified Recovery-Friendly Workplace:
(1) To become a participant, an employer must do all of the following:
a. Submit a letter of intent;
b. Complete the orientation process;
c. Prepare a Recovery-Friendly Workplace pledge; and
d. Notify all employees and board members of the intent to become a
participant.
(2) To become certified as a Recovery-Friendly Workplace, an employer must do
all of the following:
a. Complete all steps for becoming a participant.
b. Complete a standardized assessment of current policies and practices.
c. Establish a framework for setting and pursuing workplace
improvements that support recovery-friendly practices, with flexibility
to adapt goals as needed.
d. Implement evidence-informed policies to support employees in
recovery, including flexible leave policies and confidential access to
treatment and recovery services.
SECTION 1.(d) Certification. – The Program shall recognize certified
Recovery-Friendly Workplaces through press releases and/or Program-sponsored events.
SECTION 1.(e) Renewal. – Employers must complete an annual review process to
maintain their status, including:
(1) Reviewing activities from the past year to assess alignment with
recovery-friendly practices.
Page 2 House Bill 351-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Identifying opportunities for continued improvement and updating workplace
strategies accordingly.
(3) Completing a Program satisfaction survey.
SECTION 2. Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the Opioid Settlement
Fund the sum of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to
implement the Recovery-Friendly Workplace Program. These funds shall be allocated to the
North Carolina Department of Health and Human Services for the purpose of subcontracting with
a qualified professional organization, as outlined in this act, to oversee and administer the
program.
SECTION 3. Effective Date. – This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
House Bill 351-First Edition Page 3